Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-308
Municipal corporations; powers.

Any municipal corporation may contract with any person and provide funds for home-delivered meals for the elderly and senior volunteer programs.

Laws 1975, LB 307, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1730;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 1.